Maryland, session 2026, SB0738.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
15–102.3.
(P) THE PROVISIONS OF § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE APPLY TO
MANAGED CARE ORGANIZATIONS IN THE SAME MANNER AS THEY APPLY TO
CARRIERS.
15–103.
(a) (1) The Secretary shall administer the Maryland Medical Assistance
Program.
(2) The Program:
(xxvii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, if providing coverage for
the delivery of anesthesia, shall provide coverage for the delivery of anesthesia in
accordance with § 15–862 of the Insurance Article; [and]
(xxviii) Beginning on January 1, 2026, shall provide calcium score
testing in accordance with § 15–863 of the Insurance Article; AND
(XXIX) BEGINNING ON JANUARY 1, 2027, SHALL PROVIDE
COVERAGE FOR MOBILE CRISIS AND CRISIS STABILIZATION SERVICES IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 15–864 OF THE INSURANCE ARTICLE.
Article – Insurance
15–864.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “MOBILE CRISIS AND CRISIS STABILIZATION
SERVICES” MEANS IMMEDIATE, IN–PERSON MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS ASSESSMENT,
DE–ESCALATION, AND STABILIZATION.
(B) THIS SECTION APPLIES TO:
(1) INSURERS AND NONPROFIT HEALTH SERVICE PLANS THAT
PROVIDE HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS

SENATE BILL 738 3
ON AN EXPENSE–INCURRED BASIS UNDER HEALTH INSURANCE POLICIES OR
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE; AND
(2) HEALTH MAINTENANCE ORGANIZATIONS THAT PROVIDE
HOSPITAL, MEDICAL, OR SURGICAL BENEFITS TO INDIVIDUALS OR GROUPS UNDER
CONTRACTS THAT ARE ISSUED OR DELIVERED IN THE STATE.
(C) AN ENTITY SUBJECT TO THIS SECTION SHALL PROVIDE COVERAGE FOR
MOBILE CRISIS AND CRISIS STABILIZATION SERVICES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall apply to all
policies, contracts, and health benefit plans issued, delivered, or renewed in the State on or
after January 1, 2027.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
January 1, 2027.